Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2132.01
Motorcycle Safety Education Fund;
transfers.

Within
sixty days after January 1, 2012, twenty-five percent of the money remaining
in the Motorcycle Safety Education Fund shall be transferred to the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of the money remaining
in the Motorcycle Safety Education Fund shall be transferred to the Highway
Trust Fund. The Motorcycle Safety Education Fund shall be eliminated on such
date after the transfers are made.

Laws 2011, LB170, § 13.